dictsource/fr_rules
// French translation rules for Espeak

// ***************************************************************************
// *   Copyright (C) 2005 to 2014 by Jonathan Duddington                     *
// *   email: jonsd@users.sourceforge.net                                    *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// 2006-11-18  Gilles Casse  <gcasse@oralux.org>
// Initial rules for French, imported from
//   Cicero TTS: A Small, Fast and Free Text-To-Speech Engine.
// http://www.fluxnic.net/cicero
//
// Rules are now maintained by Michel Such <michel.such@free.fr>
// Last update: 2014-02-20 Michel Such  <michel.such@free.fr>
//

// Letter classes:
// A  all vowels:  a e i o u y â ä é ê è î ï ô ö ù û
// C  all consonants
// Y  front vowels: e i y é ê è î
// K  not a vowel  (i.e. consonant, space, )

.replace
œ oe


.L01 d e l n r t u
.L02 b c d f g h k p t v
.L03 d l m n s t v
.L04 c d f g l m n v
.L05 g h k l m v w

// Following groups are used to manage mute e inside words.

// After or before L06, e is not mute
.L06 bl br cl cr ct dr fl fr ft gl gr kl kr pl pr tr vr

// After L07, e is not mute
.L07 ec éc ed éd lb lc ld lg lm ln lp lt lv rb rc rd rf rg rl rm rn rp rs rt rv

// All consonants + ch gu qu used as ch g k
.L08 b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ch qu gu

// E placed after a consonant following L09 is not mute
.L09 l r s

// When these diphtonges are after a consonant folllowing e, e is not mute
.L10 ia ie io ua ue ui uo
.L11 b p t
.L12 é è ê aï al ib ia ie il io iq l om on ré rè uy yl ym

// Words ending "son" pust sound english if preceded by L13
.L13 d g k l p er hn

// For english words ending "side"
.L14 be in up ut
.L15 c f g h

// Hours
.L16 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 00 01 02 03 04 05 06 07 08 09 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23

// Minutes
.L17 0 1 2 3 4 5

// Plurals and other that shouldn't pronounce s at the end
.L18 continu courbatu discontinu dodu imbu promu tribu camu détritu rébu
// Words that should pronounce the s
.L19 clausu consensu cursu typhu diplodocu eucalyptu cirru

.group a
        ae (_      e         // reggae vitae
        aen        A~        // caen (diff Cicero: aA~)
        ae         aE        // maestro
        aim (K     E~        // faim
        ain (K     E~        // pain
    Ct) ain (_     E~n2      // certain ami
    ch) ain (_     E~n2      // prochain arret
        ai       E
      ai (_      e
_bal)      ai (_      E
_ess)      ai (_      E
_vr)      ai (_      E
        aie      E
        ais (_      Ez2
        ait (_      Et2
        aient      Et2
     f) ai (sA     @         // faisons faisan
        a (ilK     a
        am (L11      A~        // jambon, tampon
        am (m      a         // programmation
     _) am (n      am        // amnistie
        am (n      a         // condamner

  _L04) an (_      an
        an (n_     a
    _h) an (_      an
     _) anti (@@P4 A~ti
     _) anti (CAXP4 A~ti
     _) arché (@P5 arke      // archéologue
     _) archéo (@P6 arkeo    // archéologue
     _) arch (aP4  ark       // archange
     _) arch (oP4  ark       // archonte
     _) anarcho (@P7 anarko  // anarchosyndicalisme

        a (nnA     a         // manne
        an (K      A~        // ancien, élan
        an (h      an
   @@m) an (_      an        // tennisman
    zm) an (_      an        // jazzman
  L02m) an (_      an
  lism) an (_      A~        // talisman
   ulm) an (_      A~        // musulman
 _caïm) an (_      A~        // caïman
    _C) aon (_     A~        // faon, paon, taon
     s) aoul (_    u         // saoul
     s) aou (le    u         // saoule
        août       ut        // août
        août (i    aus       // aoûtien
        aut (_     ot2
        a (ô                 // saune
        au         o        // au, aux
        aud (_     o         // chaud
_C)        aud (_     od         // Maud
        au (l_     O         // Paul
        au (re_    O         // dinosaure
     _) audio (@P5 odio
     _) auto (@P4  oto
     _) autom (n   otO
    bb) aye (X     ei        // abbaye
        ay (C      E         // aymé
        ay         Ej        // paye
        ay (ak     aj        // kayak
        ay (_      E        // display
    bb) aye (_    aj     // cobbaye layer
    Xl) ayer (X    EjWr     // player, layer
     h) am (_S2      am
     w) an (_      an
        a          a         // bateau

// group a: English section
        any        _^_en
        aw (K      _^_en


.group b
        bb         b         // abbé
    om) b (_                 // plomb applomb
        b          b         // aube

// group b: English section
        back       _^_en
_)      be (L15A   _^_en
        board      _^_en     // board, keyboard
        box (_     _^_en     // box, inbox, outbox
        bugg       _^_en     // debugger


.group c
     _) c' (P2v    s         // s
        cch        k         // bacchanale
        cc (Y      ks        // accéder
        cc         k         // occuper
     _) c (d       se
     _) ch (arism  k         // charisme, charismatique
     _) ch (irop   k         // chiroptère
   _) coe (la     se         // coelacante
     a) ch (_      k         // almanach
    ar) c (ti                // arctique
     e) ch (_      k         // varech
    ni) ch (_      k
    _A) ch (o_     k         // écho
  mani) ch (é      k         // manichéisme
    wi) ch         tS        // sandwich
  mito) ch (o      k         // mitochondrie
   _eu) ch (ari    k         // eucharistie
    or) ch (esC    k         // orchestre
    or) ch (iC     k         // orchidée
     _) ch (ao     k         // chaos, chaotique
     _) ch (orA    k         // chorale
     _) ch (oriz   S
     _) ch (oro    S
        ch (r      k         // chrétien
     _) chrono (@P6 krono
        ch (l      k
        ch (n      k
        ch (s      k
        ch (to     k
        ch         S         // chien
        ck         k         // nickel
        cqu        k         // grecque
        cq         k         // pecq
     s) c (Y
     x) c (Y
        c (Y       s         // cède
     _) cyber (P5  sibEr
   Can) c (_                 // banc
   Con) c (_                 // tronc, jonc
  _don) c (_       k         // donc
  cler) c (_                 // leclerc
 tchou) c (_
  taba) c (_
  toma) c (_
    se) c (ond     g         // seconde secondaire
        c          k         // recoin donc
zin)	c (_			g			// zinc

        cient (_   sit2      // ils appr�ient, remercient.
  effi) cient      sjA~      // coefficient
  défi) cient      sjA~      // déficient
        cast (_S4  kast      // podcast
        casts (_S5 kast      // podcasts
     _) clown      klun

// group c: English section
     n) ch (_      _^_en     // french
        ch (ment   _^_en     // attachment
        cut (_     _^_en     // cut, shortcut


.group ç

        ç          s         // rançon
     _) ç' (P2v    s


.group d
        dd         d         // addition
     _) d' (P2     d
  _ban) d (_       d
  _lan) d (_       d         // land
 _stan) d (_       d         // stand
    an) d (_
  _san) d (_       d

 _gran) d (_       t2        // grand ami, grand marchand
   Cen) d (_       t2
   Con) d (_
   con) d (_       t2
  quen) d (_       t2
     r) d (_
  _har) d (_       d
   lor) d (_       d
    oi) d (_
    ou) d (_

        dt (_      t         // Schmidt
   _ni) d (_                 // nid
        d          d         // don bled
 _expé) dien (t_   djA~      // expédient
V_expé) dien (t_   di        // expédient
_ingré) dien (t_   djA~      // ingrédient
        dien (t_   di        // étudient (verbe)
     _) dendro (@P6 dE~dro

// group d: English section
        day (_     _^_en
     _) devic      _^_en
        dle (X     _^_en     // bundle, handle

.group e

// Define use of the final 'e' in french
        e (_

// Manage mute e inside words
@C)	e (CeCA	@
@L08)	e (CA
@L08)	e (CL10C	@
@L08)	e (L06
@L08)	e (L06L10C	@
@L06)	e (CA	@
@L06)	e (L06	@
@L07)	e (CA	@
@L07)	e (L06	@
@L09gu)	e (CA	@
@L09gu)	e (L06	@
@L09qu)	e (CA	@
@L09qu)	e (L06	@
     e (ct+++++    E
     e (x+++++    E

    _C) e (_       @-        // je te
    -c) e (_
    -j) e (_
     C) e (-

_)      e (CAN     e		// Evident
_)      e (L06A  e     // Ecran
_eC)      e (CA++  E     // Evenement
        eau (++       o         // bateau
        e (CC       E
   cap) e (la_     E
    gh) e (tAX     E         // spagheti
     p) ect (_     E        // suspect
        ect (_     Ekt       // direct
    pi) ed (_      e         // pied
  _art) e (++      e         // arte, artefact
   _cl) ef (_      e         // clef
     _) ein (K     ajn        // Einstein
        ein (K     E~        // peindre
    pl) ein (_     E~n2      // plein emploi
        e (il      E         // vieille
        ei         E         // neige
        e (oi               // asseoir
        el (l      E        // belle
    _f) em (me     a         // femme
     i) e (mA                // remerciement, d�ploiement
     A) e (rA                // remerciera
   tch) e (rX      W
     @) em (me     a         // patiemment
        em (L11    A~        // décembre
     _) em (m      A~         // j'emmène
    _r) em (m      A~         // remmaillage
        em (mACC   A~        // emmancher
        em (mACAC  A~        // emmagasiner
        em (ma     E        // emmanuel
        em (mai    A~        // emmailloter
     l) em (n      a         // solemnel
    il) emn        Em        // dilemne
        en (_      A~n2      // en
        en (hA     A~n       // enharmonique
    _C) en (j      E~        // benjamin
 _flam) en (c      E~        // flamenco
     _) en (A      A~n       // enivrer

     C) en (d_     A~        // comprend dépend
    od) en (dr     E~        // rhododendron
    qu) en (d_     A~

  pati) en         A~        // patient patience
        en (nu     A~        // ennui
        en (nA     E         // penne ennemi

     é) en (_      E~        // européen

    Ci) en (nA     E         // mienne

    éC) en (t_     A~        // récent différent élément
   équ) en (t_     A~        // fréquent, conséquent
  étic) en (t_     A~        // réticent

    _C) en (t_     A~        // cent vent lent dent
    cc) en (t_     A~        // accent
   Asc) en (t_     A~        // luminescent
  _dol) en (t_     A~        // dolent
    ol) en (t_     A~        // somnolent, violent
   Vol) en (t_               // somnolent, violent
   Xol) ent (_     t2        // volent
   eul) ent (_     t2        // veulent
    ul) en (t_     A~        // turbulent
    Ccul) ent (_	t2
   Vul) ent (_		t2
 imCoC) en (t_     A~        // impotent
 inCoC) en (t_     A~        // innocent, indolent

XACcid) en (t_     A~        // accident, occident
